Utah statutes.
72-4-201.   I-15 designated as Veterans' Memorial Highway.

(1)  There is established the Veterans' Memorial Highway composed of the existing Interstate Highway 15 from the Utah-Idaho border to the Utah-Arizona border.

(2)  The department shall designate Interstate 15 as the "Veterans' Memorial Highway" on all future state highway maps.

